Alabama, session 2026rs, SB236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Life on Wheels is exempted from paying
any sales and use taxes.
(b) The exemption provided in this section shall not
apply to county or municipal sales or use taxes unless
approved pursuant to Section 40-23-4.01, Code of Alabama 1975.
(c) The exemption provided pursuant to this section
shall be available from September 1, 2026, to August 31, 2029.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 1